Nevada, session 83, SB135.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Communities In Schools of Nevada the sum of
$1,000,000 for the purpose of providing integrated support services,
including, without limitation, services related to academics, basic
needs, physical and mental health and social and life skills to pupils
enrolled in public schools in this State.
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
Communities In Schools of Nevada agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by Communities In
Schools of Nevada through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by Communities In
Schools of Nevada through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of Communities In Schools of Nevada, regardless of their
form or location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary
to conduct an audit of the use of the money appropriated by
subsection 1.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)